Hawaii statutes.
§454F-4.9 Abandoned applications. (a)
An application for licensure pursuant to this chapter shall be considered
abandoned if an applicant fails to provide evidence of continued efforts to
complete the licensing application process for thirty days. The thirty-day
period shall begin on the last day of contact with the division by the
applicant. The commissioner may extend this period for good cause. No
refund of filing fees shall be provided to an applicant for an abandoned
application. The commissioner shall not be required to act on any
abandoned application and is not required to retain abandoned applications or
supporting documents. The commissioner may withdraw abandoned
applications from NMLS.

(b) For purposes of this section, failure
to provide evidence of continued efforts to complete the licensing process
includes:

(1) Failure to submit required documents and other
information requested by the commissioner within thirty days from the last date
the documents or other information were requested; or

(2) Failure to provide the commissioner with any
written communication indicating that the applicant is attempting to complete
the licensing process for a period of thirty days.

(c) If an application is deemed abandoned
by the commissioner, the applicant may reapply for licensure after payment of
applicable fees and compliance with the licensing requirements in effect at the
time of reapplication.

(d) An applicant may withdraw an
application that has been submitted under this chapter at any time; provided
that no refund shall be issued. The commissioner shall treat a withdrawn
application as an abandoned application according to this section. [L 2011, c
194, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 252, §8; am L 2013, c 168, §20]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next